Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.235

Construction—Practices prohibited. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize licensed scrap metal businesses to purchase or sell junk vehicles or major component parts as defined in RCW 46.79.010.

[ 2024 c 301 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.